Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1416
Revenue bonds; issuance; payment; dock fund.

Whenever the dock board shall deem it necessary or advisable to issue bonds for the purpose of constructing any of the works or improvements herein authorized, or purchasing property for said purpose or maintaining or operating the same, the board shall petition the county board or the governing body of such municipality, as the case may be, to issue such bonds stating the purpose for which the bonds are requested. Thereupon the county board or the governing body may, in its discretion, issue revenue bonds of such county or municipality, the principal and interest of which shall be payable solely out of revenue to be derived from tolls and other charges and receipts from the use and operation of the docks and other property. The county or city shall incur no indebtedness of any kind or nature upon the issuance of such bonds, and they shall so recite, and to support the use and operation of the docks and other property the county or city shall not pledge its credit nor its taxing power nor any part thereof. The proceeds of the bonds when issued shall be paid to the treasurer of such county or municipality, as the case may be, and credited to the dock fund.

Laws 1937, c. 37, § 3, p. 173;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2003;

R.S.1943, § 18-715;

Laws 1967, c. 84, § 13, p. 267;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-715.